apertium-fin-eng.fin.lexc
LEXICON V_JUODA

%<inf%>:uoda # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:uo V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:uo V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:u V_PRESENT_SG3_O ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:uo V_PASSIVE_D ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:o V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:o V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_UIDA
%<inf%>:uida # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ui V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ui V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:u V_PRESENT_SG3_I ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:ui V_PASSIVE_D ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_SYÖDÄ

%<inf%>:yödä # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:yö V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:yö V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:y V_PRESENT_SG3_O ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:yö V_PASSIVE_D ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ö V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ö V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_SAADA

%<inf%>:ada # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:a V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:a V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:a V_PASSIVE_D ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_MYYDÄ
%<inf%>:ydä # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:y V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:y V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:y V_PASSIVE_D ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_NÄHDÄ

%<inf%>:hdä # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ke V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ke V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:h V_PASSIVE_D ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:k V_PAST_STRONG ;
%<actv%>:h  V_NUT ;

LEXICON V_NAURAA

%<inf%>:aa  # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:e V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:%{O%} V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:%{O%} V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_MENNÄ

%<inf%>:nä # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_N ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_LÖYTÄÄ

%<inf%>:tää # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:d%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:det V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_STRONG ;



LEXICON V_LOPETTAA

%<inf%>:t%{A%}%{A%} # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:e V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:t V_PAST_STRONG ;
%<actv%>:ta V_NUT ;

LEXICON V_LEIKKIÄ

%<inf%>:kiä  # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ki V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ki V_PRESENT_SG3_I ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:i V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:i V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ki V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_KÄVELLÄ

%<inf%>:lä  # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_L ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:l V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:l V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_KERTOA

%<inf%>:toa # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ro V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:to V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:to V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:ro V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ro V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:to V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_KATSOA
%<inf%>:a # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_O ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;
%<actv%>:0 V_NUT ;

LEXICON V_POIMIA
%<inf%>:ia # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_SG3_O ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:i V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_JUOSTA

%<inf%>:sta # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:kse V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:kse V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:kse V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:s V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:st V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:st V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_LASKEA

%<inf%>:ea # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:e V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_KULKEA
%<inf%>:kea # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:je V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ke V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ke V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:je V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:j V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:k V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_ISTUA

%<inf%>:%{A%} # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_MUUTTUA
%<inf%>:t%{U%}%{A%} # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{U%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{U%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{U%} V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:%{U%} V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:%{U%} V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:t%{U%} V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_HALUTA

%<inf%>:t%{A%} # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_STRONG ;
%<actv%>:n V_NUT ;

LEXICON V_ETSIÄ

%<inf%>:iä # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_SG3_I ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:i V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_TULLA

%<inf%>:la # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:e V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_L ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_AJATELLA

%<inf%>:tella # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tele V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tele V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tele V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:el V_PASSIVE_L ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:tel V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:tel V_PAST_STRONG ;

lEXICON V_ISTUA

%<inf%>:a # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;


LEXICON V_OLLA

%<inf%>:olla # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ole V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:o V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:ol V_PASSIVE_L ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ol V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ol V_PAST_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:on V_CLITS? ;
%<actv%>%<pp%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ollut V_CLITS? ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<conneg%>:ollut # ;
%<actv%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<conneg%>:olleet # ;

LEXICON V_TAPAHTUA
%<inf%>:tua # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tu V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tu V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:tu V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:du V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:du V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:tu V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_ALKAA
%<inf%>:k%{A%}%{A%}  # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:k%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:%{A%} V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:e V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:%{O%} V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:k%{O%} V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_ANTAA
%<inf%>:t%{A%}%{A%}  # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:n%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:ne V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:n%{O%} V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:t%{O%} V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_SATAA
%<inf%>:t%{A%}%{A%}  # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:d%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:d%{O%} V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:t%{O%} V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON Verbs
ajatella%<vblex%>:ajat V_AJATELLA ; ! "think"
alkaa%<vblex%>:al V_ALKAA ; ! "think"
antaa%<vblex%>:an V_ANTAA ; ! "give"
etsiä%<vblex%>:ets V_ETSIÄ ; ! "search"
haluta%<vblex%>:halu V_HALUTA ; ! "want"
huomata%<vblex%>:huoma V_HALUTA ; ! "notice"
huutaa%<vblex%>:huu V_LÖYTÄÄ ; ! "scream"
istua%<vblex%>:istu V_ISTUA ; ! "sit"
juoda%<vblex%>:j V_JUODA ; ! "eat"
juosta%<vblex%>:juo V_JUOSTA ; ! "run"
katsoa%<vblex%>:katso V_KATSOA ; ! "look"
kertoa%<vblex%>:ker V_KERTOA ; ! "tell"
kulkea%<vblex%>:kul V_KULKEA ; ! "go by method"
kuulla%<vblex%>:kuul V_TULLA ; ! "come"
kuulua%<vblex%>:kuulu V_ISTUA ; ! "belong hear"
kuunnella%<vblex%>:kuun V_AJATELLA ; ! "listen"
kylmätä%<vblex%>:kylmä V_HALUTA ; ! "cold"
kysyä%<vblex%>:kysy V_ISTUA ; ! "aks"
kävellä%<vblex%>:kävel V_KÄVELLÄ ; ! "walk"
käyttää%<vblex%>:käyt V_LOPETTAA ; ! " use"
laskea%<vblex%>:lask V_LASKEA ; ! "count"
leikkiä%<vblex%>:leik V_LEIKKIÄ ; ! "play"
lopettaa%<vblex%>:lopet V_LOPETTAA ; ! "finish"
luulla%<vblex%>:luul V_TULLA ; ! "knowthink"
löytää%<vblex%>:löy V_LÖYTÄÄ ; ! "find"
mennä%<vblex%>:men V_MENNÄ ; ! "go"
muuttua%<vblex%>:muut V_MUUTTUA ; ! "change (intransitive)"
myydä%<vblex%>:my V_MYYDÄ ; ! "sell"
nauraa%<vblex%>:naur V_NAURAA ; ! "laugh"
nähdä%<vblex%>:nä V_NÄHDÄ ; ! "see"
odottaa%<vblex%>:odot V_LOPETTAA ; ! "wait"
olla%<vblex%>:0  V_OLLA ; ! "be / have"
osata%<vblex%>:osa V_HALUTA ; ! "know"
ottaa%<vblex%>:ot V_LOPETTAA ; ! "take"
pitää%<vblex%>:pi V_LÖYTÄÄ ; ! "like"
poimia%<vblex%>:poim V_POIMIA ; ! "pick"
puhaltaa%<vblex%>:puhal V_LÖYTÄÄ ; ! "blow"
puhua%<vblex%>:puhu V_ISTUA ; ! "speak"
pystyä%<vblex%>:pysty V_ISTUA ; ! "can"
saada%<vaux%>:sa V_SAADA ; ! "can"
saada%<vblex%>:sa V_SAADA ; ! "get"
sanoa%<vblex%>:sano V_KATSOA ; ! "say"
sataa%<vblex%>:sa V_SATAA ; ! "rain"
syödä%<vblex%>:s V_SYÖDÄ ; ! "eat"
tapahtua%<vblex%>:tapah V_TAPAHTUA ; ! "happen/occur"
tehdä%<vblex%>:te V_NÄHDÄ ; ! "do"
tulla%<vblex%>:tul V_TULLA ; ! "come"
tuoda%<vblex%>:t V_JUODA ; ! "bring"
tuulla%<vblex%>:tuul V_TULLA ; ! "(wind) blow"
uida%<vblex%>: V_UIDA ; ! "swim"
vastata%<vblex%>:vasta V_HALUTA ; ! "answer"
viskata%<%>:viskasi V_HALUTA ;
voittaa%<%>:voit V_LOPETTAA ;
yrittää%<vblex%>:yrit V_LOPETTAA ; ! "try"
